Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8125.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 30 of the General Laws entitled "MILITARY AFFAIRS AND
DEFENSE" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 30.4
THE MILITARY CHILD ACT
30-30.4-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Military Child Act."
30-30.4-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Military-connected student” means a student who is the dependent of either a person
in the active military service of the United States or in a full-time status during active service with
a force of the Rhode Island national guard.
30-30.4-3. Advance enrollment.
A military-connected student whose parent or guardian is being relocated to this state under
military orders and is transferred to or is pending transfer to a military installation within the state,
shall be deemed to be a resident pupil of a school system of a city or town for the purposes of
enrollment. The Rhode Island board of education shall permit military-connected students to enroll
preliminarily by remote registration without charge and shall not require the parents or guardians
of the military-connected student or the student to physically appear at a location within the district
to register the student, if the parents or guardians present evidence of military orders that a parent

or guardian shall be stationed in this state during the current or following school year. The parents
or guardians may use an address within the school district where the military-connected student is
to be enrolled of a temporary on-base billeting facility, a purchased or leased home or apartment,
or federal government or public-private venture off-base military housing. Proof of required
residency shall not be required at the time of the remote registration, but shall be required within
ten (10) days of the student’s attendance in the school system of the city or town where the student
resides.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005801
========
LC005801 - Page 2 of 3